Indiana, session 2026, HB1076.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 34-30-37 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 37. Liability Connected With Off-Road Vehicle Use on
Real Property
Sec. 1. This chapter does not:
(1) apply to a relationship between an employer (as defined in
IC 22-3-6-1(a)) and an employee (as defined in
IC 22-3-6-1(b)); or
(2) prevent or limit the liability of an owner, a spectator, or a
promoter that does any of the following:
(A) Intentionally injures a participant.
(B) Commits an act or omission of gross negligence
concerning the safety of a participant that proximately
causes the participant's injury or death.
(C) Fails to use the degree of care that an ordinarily
careful and prudent person would use under the same or
2026 IN 1076—LS 6463/DI 154


similar circumstances.
(D) Commits other acts, errors, or omissions that:
(i) constitute willful or wanton misconduct, gross
negligence, or criminal conduct; and
(ii) proximately cause injury, damage, or death.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "inherent risks of off-road
vehicle use" means the dangers or conditions that are an integral
part of off-road vehicle use on roads, trails, paths, or other
surfaces, including the following:
(1) Injury or death caused by:
(A) a change or variation in the surface that may cause a
participant to:
(i) lose the ability to steer the off-road vehicle;
(ii) lose the participant's balance; or
(iii) crash the off-road vehicle;
(B) a collision with an object; or
(C) an attack by an animal.
(2) Operator error, including equipment failure due to
operator error.
(3) The aggravation of an already existing injury, illness, or
condition because the aggravation of the already existing
injury, illness, or condition occurred in a remote place where
medical facilities are not readily available.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "off-road vehicle" means a
vehicle that is:
(1) self-propelled; and
(2) designed primarily for off-road use.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "owner" means an individual, a
group of individuals, a club, or a business entity (as defined in
IC 2-2.2-1-2), whether or not operating for profit, or an employee
of a business entity, that owns real property and provides to a
participant the use of the real property for off-road vehicle use.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "participant" means an
individual who rents, leases, or uses an off-road vehicle on an
owner's real property whether or not a fee is paid.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "promoter" means an individual,
a group of individuals, a club, or a business entity (as defined in
IC 2-2.2-1-2), whether or not operating for profit, or an employee
of a business entity, that sponsors or organizes a participant's use
of an owner's real property for off-road vehicle use.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "spectator" means an individual
that is legally present on an owner's real property for the purpose
2026 IN 1076—LS 6463/DI 154


of watching a participant engage in off-road vehicle use.
Sec. 8. An owner, a spectator, and a promoter are immune from
civil liability arising from a claim brought by a participant or the
participant's personal representative concerning:
(1) the damage to or the loss of the participant's property; or
(2) the participant's injury or death;
that results from the inherent risks of off-road vehicle use.
2026 IN 1076—LS 6463/DI 154